Utah statutes.
13-49-304.   Translations -- Prohibited acts.

(1)  For purposes of this section, "literal translation" of a word or phrase from one language means the translation of a word or phrase without regard to the true meaning of the word or phrase in the language that is being translated.

(2)  An immigration consultant may not, with the intent to mislead, literally translate, from English into another language, words or titles, including, "notary public," "notary," "licensed," "attorney," "lawyer," or any other terms that imply that the person is an attorney, in any document, including an advertisement, stationery, letterhead, business card, or other comparable written material describing the immigration consultant.

